District of Columbia statutes.
29A-971.13

Repealed

Uniformity of application and construction.

Repealed.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-231, § 14, 48 DCR 1603
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(r), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-971.13.